Illinois, session 104th, SB1285.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Health Care Violence Prevention Act is 5amended by changing Section 15 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 160/15)7    Sec. 15. Workplace safety.8    (a) A health care worker who contacts law enforcement or 9files a report with law enforcement against a patient or 10individual because of workplace violence shall provide notice 11to management of the health care provider by which he or she is 12employed within 3 days after contacting law enforcement or 13filing the report.14    (a-5) A health care provider shall report any incident of 15verbal aggression or physical assault of a health care worker 16employed by the health care provider in the health care 17provider's emergency department to the Department of Public 18Health. The Department of Public Health shall track 19information reported under this subsection to assess each 20health care provider's progress in systemically limiting the 21verbal aggression toward and physical assault of health care 22workers. 23    (b) No management of a health care provider may discourage   SB1285- 2 -LRB104 06052 BAB 16085 b1a health care worker from exercising his or her right to 2contact law enforcement or file a report with law enforcement 3because of workplace violence.4    (c) A health care provider that employs a health care 5worker shall display a notice, either by physical or 6electronic means, stating that verbal aggression will not be 7tolerated and physical assault will be reported to law 8enforcement. The notice shall also be displayed in each 9emergency department of the health care provider. 10    (d) The health care provider shall offer immediate 11post-incident services for a health care worker directly 12involved in a workplace violence incident caused by patients 13or their visitors, including acute treatment and access to 14psychological evaluation.15(Source: P.A. 102-4, eff. 4-27-21.) 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.